Utah statutes.
63E-1-102.   Definitions -- List of Independent entities.

As used in this title:

(1)  "Authorizing statute" means the statute creating an entity as an independent entity.

(2)  "Committee" means the Retirement and Independent Entities Committee created by Section 63E-1-201.

(3)  "Independent corporation" means a corporation incorporated in accordance with Chapter 2, Independent Corporations Act.

(4) (a)  "Independent entity" means an entity having a public purpose relating to the state or its citizens that is individually created by the state or is given by the state the right to exist and conduct its affairs as an:

(i)  independent state agency; or

(ii)  independent corporation.

(b)  "Independent entity" includes the:

(i)  Utah Dairy Commission created by Section 4-22-2;

(ii)  Heber Valley Historic Railroad Authority created by Section 63H-4-102;

(iii)  Utah State Railroad Museum Authority created by Section 63H-5-102;

(iv)  Utah Science Center Authority created by Section 63H-3-103;

(v)  Utah Housing Corporation created by Section 35A-8-704;

(vi)  Utah State Fair Corporation created by Section 63H-6-103;

(vii)  Workers' Compensation Fund created by Section 31A-33-102;

(viii)  Utah State Retirement Office created by Section 49-11-201;

(ix)  School and Institutional Trust Lands Administration created by Section 53C-1-201;

(x)  Utah Communications Agency Network created by Section 63C-7-201;

(xi)  Utah Energy Infrastructure Authority created by Section 63H-2-201;

(xii)  Utah Capital Investment Corporation created by Section 63M-1-1207; and

(xiii)  Military Installation Development Authority created by Section 63H-1-201.

(c)  Notwithstanding this Subsection (4), "independent entity" does not include:

(i)  the Public Service Commission of Utah created by Section 54-1-1;

(ii)  an institution within the state system of higher education;

(iii)  a city, county, or town;

(iv)  a local school district;

(v)  a local district under Title 17B, Limited Purpose Local Government Entities - Local Districts; or

(vi)  a special service district under Title 17D, Chapter 1, Special Service District Act.

(5)  "Independent state agency" means an entity that is created by the state, but is independent of the governor's direct supervisory control.

(6)  "Money held in trust" means money maintained for the benefit of:

(a)  one or more private individuals, including public employees;

(b)  one or more public or private entities; or

(c)  the owners of a quasi-public corporation.

(7)  "Public corporation" means an artificial person, public in ownership, individually created by the state as a body politic and corporate for the administration of a public purpose relating to the state or its citizens.

(8)  "Quasi-public corporation" means an artificial person, private in ownership, individually created as a corporation by the state which has accepted from the state the grant of a franchise or contract involving the performance of a public purpose relating to the state or its citizens.



Amended by Chapter 220, 2013 General Session

